Washington statutes.
RCW 15.13.290

Nursery dealer licenses—Additional charge for late renewal.

If any application for renewal of a nursery dealer license is not filed prior to the business license expiration date, the business license delinquency fee must be assessed under chapter 19.02 RCW and must be paid by the applicant before the renewal license is issued.

[ 2013 c 144 s 4; 2000 c 144 s 8; 1982 c 182 s 21; 1971 ex.s. c 33 s 5.]

NOTES:

Business licensing

delinquency fee—Rate—Disposition: RCW 19.02.085.

expiration date: RCW 19.02.090.